Alabama, session 2026rs, SB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
19 Section 1. Sections 34-7B-1 and 34-7B-13, Code of
20 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
21 "§34-7B-1
22 For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms
23 shall have the following meanings:
24 (1) APPRENTICE. Any person engaged in learning the
25 practices defined in this article including, but not limited
26 to, assisting in the performance of any acts of barbering or
27 cosmetology on the general public under the constant and
28 direct supervision of a person who has held a valid current
Page 1

direct supervision of a person who has held a valid current
SB183 Enrolled
29 license issued by the board for at least five years, in a shop
30 licensed by the board.
31 (2) BARBERING. The occupation of shaving or trimming
32 the beard, cutting or dressing the hair, giving facial or
33 scalp massages, giving facial or scalp treatment with oils or
34 creams or other preparations made for that purpose, either by
35 hand or by means of mechanical appliances, singeing and
36 shampooing the hair, dyeing the hair, or permanently waving or
37 straightening the hair of any living or deceased person for
38 compensation, as performed by a Class 2 barber.
39 (3) BOARD. The Alabama Board of Cosmetology and
40 Barbering.
41 (4) CLASS 1 BARBER. A person who only does the
42 following in his or her ordinary course of business: Arranges,
43 cleans, cuts, or singes the hair of any person or massages,
44 cleans, stimulates, exercises, or does similar work on the
45 scalp, face, or neck of any person with the hands, or with
46 mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliance, or by the use
47 of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or
48 creams. Any one or a combination of the following practices,
49 when done upon the human body above the seventh cervical
50 vertebra for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of
51 disease or physical or mental ailments, and when done for
52 payment, directly or indirectly, or without payment for the
53 public generally: Shaving or trimming the beard or trimming
54 the hair.
55 (5) CLASS 2 BARBER. Any person, other than a student or
56 apprentice, who performs barbering on the general public for
Page 2

apprentice, who performs barbering on the general public for
SB183 Enrolled
57 compensation, and who shall satisfy the qualifications and
58 licensure requirements provided in this chapter for a Class 2
59 barber. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "barber,"
60 standing alone, shall be deemed a reference to a Class 2
61 barber.
62 (6) COSMETOLOGIST. Any person, other than a student or
63 apprentice, who performs cosmetology on the general public for
64 compensation, and who shall satisfy the qualifications and
65 licensure requirements provided in this article for a
66 cosmetologist.
67 (7) COSMETOLOGY. Any of the practices generally
68 recognized as beauty culture, hairdressing, or any other
69 designation engaged in by any person who performs such on the
70 general public for compensation including, but not limited to,
71 cleansing, singeing, cutting, arranging, dressing, curling,
72 braiding, waxing, bleaching, weaving, coloring the hair by
73 hand or mechanical apparatus, the use of creams, lotions, or
74 cosmetic preparations, with or without massage, on the scalp,
75 face, arms, legs, feet, or hands, esthetics practices, nail
76 technology, manicure, pedicure, or desairology.
77 (8) ESTHETICIAN. Any person, other than a student or
78 apprentice, who performs esthetics on the general public for
79 compensation, and who shall satisfy the qualifications and
80 licensure requirements provided in this article for an
81 esthetician.
82 (9)(10) ESTHETICS. The practice of performing acts of
83 skin care including, but not limited to, facials, body waxing,
84 makeup, and general esthetics procedures on the general public
Page 3

makeup, and general esthetics procedures on the general public
SB183 Enrolled
85 for compensation.
86 (10)(11) ESTHETICS/MANICURE. A combination of the
87 practices of esthetics and manicure.
88 (11)(9) ESTHETICIAN/MANICURIST. Any person, other than
89 a student or apprentice, who performs a combination of the
90 practices of esthetics and manicure on the general public for
91 compensation, and who shall satisfy the qualifications and
92 licensure requirements provided in this article for an
93 esthetician/manicurist.
94 (12) INSTRUCTOR. A licensee who teaches in a licensed
95 or registered school of barbering or any branch of cosmetology
96 and completes any applicable requirements for continuing
97 education.
98 (13) LICENSE. A document issued by the board which
99 entitles the holder to practice the profession listed on the
100 document.
101 (14) LICENSEE. Any person holding a license issued
102 pursuant to this article.
103 (15) MANICURE. The practice of beautifying or grooming
104 the fingernails, toenails, adding nail tips, extensions, gels,
105 or massaging the hands, forearms, feet, or lower legs of the
106 general public for compensation.
107 (16)(17) MANICURIST. Any person, other than a student
108 or apprentice, who performs the practice of manicure on the
109 general public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
110 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
111 article for a manicurist.
112 (17)(16) MANICURE/WAXING. A combination of the
Page 4

(17)(16) MANICURE/WAXING. A combination of the
SB183 Enrolled
113 practices of manicure and waxing.
114 (18) MANICURIST/WAXER. Any person, other than a student
115 or apprentice, who performs a combination of the practices of
116 manicure and waxing on the general public for compensation,
117 and who shall satisfy the qualifications and licensure
118 requirements provided in this article for a manicurist/waxer.
119 (19) NATURAL HAIR STYLING. The practice of cleansing,
120 weaving or interweaving, extending, locking, braiding, or
121 arranging the hair without cutting, coloring, permanent
122 waving, relaxing, removing, or chemical treatments.
123 (20) NATURAL HAIRSTYLIST. Any person, other than a
124 student, who performs natural hair styling on the general
125 public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
126 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
127 article for a natural hairstylist.
128 (21) SCHOOL. An establishment licensed or registered by
129 the board to teach any or all of the practices of barbering or
130 cosmetology.
131 (22) SHAMPOO ASSISTANT. Any person who is licensed to
132 perform only the practices of shampooing, cleansing, or
133 applying temporary weekly color rinses to the hair of the
134 general public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
135 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
136 article for a shampoo assistant.
137 (23) SHOP. Any place where barbering or cosmetology is
138 practiced including, but not limited to, a mobile salon. Only
139 a properly licensed person, who is not an apprentice or a
140 student, may operate a shop.
Page 5

student, may operate a shop.
SB183 Enrolled
141 (24) STUDENT. Any person who is engaged in learning any
142 practice regulated by this article in a school licensed or
143 registered pursuant to this article, and who, as part of the
144 learning process, performs or assists in any practice
145 regulated by this article under the immediate supervision of
146 an instructor who is licensed pursuant to this article.
147 (25)(26) THREADING. The practice of eyebrow removal
148 with the use of a loop made of cotton or any other material.
149 (26)(25) THREADER. Any person engaged in the practice
150 of threading on the general public for compensation, and who
151 shall satisfy the qualifications and licensure requirements
152 provided in this article for a threader."
153 "§34-7B-13
154 (a) This chapter does not apply to any of the following
155 persons, activities, or services:
156 (1) Service in the case of emergency or domestic
157 upheaval, without compensation.
158 (2) Licensed medical professionals operating within the
159 scope of their normal practice.
160 (3) Personnel of the United States armed servicesArmed
161 Services performing their ordinary duties.
162 (4) Any public trade school or other public school or
163 school program under the purview of the State Board of
164 Education or a local board of education.
165 (5) Any person who only occasionally dresses hair and
166 receives no compensation therefor, or does any other act or
167 thing mentioned in this chapter, without holding himself or
168 herself out to the public as a provider of any practices
Page 6

herself out to the public as a provider of any practices
SB183 Enrolled
169 defined in this chapter for compensation.
170 (6) Departments in retail establishments where
171 cosmetics are demonstrated and offered for sale but where no
172 other acts of cosmetology or barbering are performed.
173 (7) The licensees of any county or municipal barber
174 board or commission in existence on August 1, 2013, unless
175 such board or commission elects, by resolution adopted by the
176 governing body of the county or municipality, to come under
177 the provisions of this chapter.
178 (8) Any person who practices as a Class 1 barber.
179 (b) Any person who practices natural hair styling as
180 defined in Section 34-7B-1, including facilities where only
181 natural hair styling is performed, shall not be required to
182 have a license issued by the board. Nothing in this section
183 shall be construed to limit the availability of a voluntary
184 natural hairstylist license to those who meet the requirements
185 of this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
186 limit the availability of a voluntary natural hairstylist
187 license to students enrolled in a public high school career
188 and technical education cosmetology program."
189 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
190 1, 2026.
Page 7

1, 2026.
SB183 Enrolled
191
192
193
194
195
196
197 ________________________________________________
198 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
199
200
201
202 ________________________________________________
203 Speaker of the House of Representatives
204
205
206 SB183
207 Senate 10-Feb-26
208 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
209 the Senate.
210
211 Patrick Harris,
212 Secretary.
213
214
215
216
217 House of Representatives
218 Amended and passed: 07-Apr-26
219
220
221
222
223 Senate concurred in House amendment 07-Apr-26
224
225
226
227
228 By: Senator Coleman
Page 8